Maryland, session 2025, SB0477.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Natural Resources
5–1012.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0477*

SENATE BILL 477
(g) (1) (i) The Department shall establish the Port of Deposit State
Historical Park as a partnership park that seeks to educate the public about and preserve
and interpret the lives and experiences of Black Americans both before and after the
abolition of slavery.
(ii) Port of Deposit State Historical Park shall be held by the State
as a State park under the protection and administration of the Department.
(2) Port of Deposit State Historical Park shall consist of a portion of the
Bainbridge Naval Training Center site, measuring not less than [120] 12 acres and not
more than [150] 19 acres, that the Bainbridge Development Corporation transfers to the
Department, including:
(i) [The historic Tome School;
(ii)] The Snow Hill archaeological site; and
[(iii)] (II) The adjacent wooded conservation area.
(3) (i) The Department shall establish a stakeholder advisory
committee to advise the Department on the scope and management of Port of Deposit State
Historical Park.
(ii) The stakeholder advisory committee shall consist of the following
members:
1. One member designated by the Mayor and Town Council
of Port Deposit;
2. Two members of the House of Delegates and one member
of the Senate of Maryland representing Cecil County, designated by the Cecil County
Delegation of the General Assembly;
3. The County Executive of Cecil County, or the County
Executive’s designee;
4. The President of the Cecil County Council, or the
President’s designee;
5. The President of the Cecil County branch of the NAACP,
or the President’s designee;
6. The President of the Historical Society of Cecil County, or
the President’s designee;
7. The Director of the Cecil County Department of Parks and
Recreation;

SENATE BILL 477 3
8. The Chair of the Bainbridge Development Corporation, or
the Chair’s designee;
9. The Chief Archaeologist of the Maryland Department of
Transportation, State Highway Administration, or the Chief Archaeologist’s designee; and
10. The following nonvoting ex officio members:
A. The Secretary, or the Secretary’s designee;
B. The Secretary of Commerce, or the Secretary’s designee;
C. The Secretary of the Environment, or the Secretary’s
designee;
D. The Secretary of Planning, or the Secretary’s designee;
E. The Director of the Maryland Historical Trust, or the
Director’s designee;
F. The President of the Lower Susquehanna Heritage
Greenway, or the President’s designee;
G. The Superintendent of Cecil County Public Schools;
H. The Executive Director of the Cecil County Public Library;
and
I. The President of Cecil College.
(iii) To the extent practicable, the stakeholder advisory committee
shall reflect the diversity of Cecil County.
(4) On or before September 1, 2024, the Department shall submit a report
to the General Assembly, in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State Government Article on:
(i) Property that is suitable for inclusion in Port of Deposit State
Historical Park;
(ii) The funding needed to establish and promote Port of Deposit
State Historical Park; and
(iii) The appropriate manner of preserving property that is not
identified for inclusion in Port of Deposit State Historical Park in perpetuity for its
archaeological, historical, and cultural significance.

SENATE BILL 477
Chapter 39 of the Acts of 2022, as amended by Chapter 602 of the Acts of 2023
SECTION 5. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That:
(a) On or before June 1, [2025] 2026, the Bainbridge Development Corporation
shall transfer to the Department of Natural Resources a portion of the Bainbridge Naval
Training Center site consisting of not less than [120] 12 acres and not more than [150] 19
acres, including:
(1) [the historic Tome School;
(2)] the Snow Hill archaeological site; and
[(3)] (2) the adjacent wooded conservation area.
(b) Any property transferred to the Department of Natural Resources under this
section that is not included in Port of Deposit State Historical Park shall be preserved in
perpetuity for its archaeological, historical, and cultural significance, in accordance with
the recommendations of the stakeholder advisory committee established under § 5–1012(g)
of the Natural Resources Article.
Chapter 602 of the Acts of 2023
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That for fiscal year 2025, the
Governor may include in the annual State budget an appropriation of at least $400,000 to
the Department of Natural Resources to conduct a Phase 1 Archaeological Survey and Soil
Study for the [Tome School and] Snow Hill [sites] SITE.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act is an emergency
measure, is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public health or safety, has
been passed by a yea and nay vote supported by three–fifths of all the members elected to
each of the two Houses of the General Assembly, and shall take effect from the date it is
enacted.